Utah statutes.
32A-12-307 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Interfering with suppliers.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a member of the commission, the director, or an employee of the department may not directly or indirectly participate in any manner, by recommendation or otherwise, in the appointment, employment, or termination of appointment or employment of an agent, representative, employee, or officer of a manufacturer, supplier, or importer of liquor to the department including a manufacturer, supplier, or importer of:

(a)  wine;

(b)  heavy beer; or

(c)  on or after October 1, 2008, a flavored malt beverage.

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) may participate in the appointment, employment, or termination of appointment or employment to determine qualifications for licensing under Chapter 8, Part 5, Local Industry Representative Licenses, and to enforce compliance with this title.

